Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3820
Registration, qualification of foreign trustee.

A foreign corporate trustee is required to qualify as a foreign corporation doing business in this state if it maintains the principal place of administration of any trust within the state. A foreign cotrustee is not required to qualify in this state solely because its cotrustee maintains the principal place of administration in this state. Unless otherwise doing business in this state, local qualification by a foreign trustee, corporate or individual, is not required in order for the trustee to receive distribution from a local estate or to hold, invest in, manage, or acquire property located in this state, or maintain litigation if the laws of the state of incorporation or residence of the foreign trustee grant the same authority to a trustee incorporated or resident in this state. Nothing in this section affects a determination of what other acts require qualification as doing business in this state.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 300, UPC § 7-105;

R.S.1943, (1995), § 30-2805;

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 20.